apertium-fra/apertium-fra.fra.lexc
! Morphological Transducer for {{French}}

Multichar_Symbols

! Part of speech categories
%<n%>   ! Noun

! Number morphology
%<pl%>  ! Plural
%<sg%>  ! Singular

! Determiner
%<det%> ! determiner
%<indefdet%> ! indef determiner

! adjectives
%<adj%>%<fem%> ! adjective feminin
%<adj%>%<mas%> ! adjective masculin 

! verb
%<verb%> ! 


! Other symbols
%>      ! Morpheme boundary




!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!                       M O R P H O T A C T I C S                         !!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!


LEXICON Root

RegNounInfl;
Verbs;
det;
indefdet;

LEXICON RegNounInfl


%<n%>%<sg%>: # ;
%<n%>%<pl%>:%>s # ;



LEXICON det

%<det%>:0 # ; 

LEXICON indefdet

%<indefdet%>:0 # ;

LEXICON VerbsER
%<verb%>%<inf>:%>:# ;
%<verb%>%<p1>:%>e# ;
%<verb%>%<p2>:%>es# ;
%<verb%>%<p3>:%>e# ;
%<verb%>%<p4>:%>ons# ;
%<verb%>%<p5>:%>ez# ;
%<verb%>%<p6>:%>ent# ;

LEXICON VerbsIR
%<verb%>%<inf>:%>:# ;
%<verbsir%>%<p1>:%>s# ;
%<verbsir%>%<p2>:%>s# ;
%<verbsir%>%<p3>:%>t# ;
%<verbsir%>%<p4>:%>ons# ;
%<verbsir%>%<p5>:%>ez# ;
%<verbsir%>%<p6>:%>ent# ;

LEXICON VerbsRE
%<verb%>%<inf>:%>:# ;
%<verb%>%<p1>:%>s# ;
%<verb%>%<p2>:%>s# ;
%<verb%>%<p3>:%>:# ;
%<verb%>%<p4>:%>ons# ;
%<verb%>%<p5>:%>ez# ;
%<verb%>%<p6>:%>ent# ;

LEXICON Verb pouvoir_savoir
%<verb%>%<inf>:%>:# ;
%<verb%>%<p1>:%>x# ;
%<verb%>%<p2>:%>x# ;
%<verb%>%<p3>:%>t# ;
%<verb%>%<p4>:%>ons# ;
%<verb%>%<p5>:%>ez# ;
%<verb%>%<p6>:%>ent# ;

LEXICON Verb_etre 
%<verb%>%<inf>:%>:# ;
%<verb%>%<p1>:%>suis# ;
%<verb%>%<p2>:%>es# ;
%<verb%>%<p3>:%>est# ;
%<verb%>%<p4>:%>sommes# ;
%<verb%>%<p5>:%>etes# ;
%<verb%>%<p6>:%>sont# ; 

LEXICON Verb_avoir 
%<verb%>%<inf>:%>:# ;
%<verb%>%<p1>:%>ai# ;
%<verb%>%<p2>:%>as# ;
%<verb%>%<p3>:%>a# ;
%<verb%>%<p4>:%>avons# ;
%<verb%>%<p5>:%>avez# ;
%<verb%>%<p6>:%>ont# ; 



LEXICON Verb_aller 
%<verb%>%<inf>:%>:# ;
%<verb%>%<p1>:%>vais# ;
%<verb%>%<p2>:%>vas# ;
%<verb%>%<p3>:%>va# ;
%<verb%>%<p4>:%>allons# ;
%<verb%>%<p5>:%>allez# ;
%<verb%>%<p6>:%>vont#;

LEXICON Adjectives;

%<adj%>%<fem%>:%>e# ; ! adjective feminin
%<adj%>%<mas%>:# ; ! adjective masculin 
%<adj%>%<mas%>:%>s# ;! plural masculin
%<adj%>%<fem%>%<plur%>:%>e:%>s# ; ! plural feminin 



!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!                          L E X I C O N                                  !!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!




LEXICON RegNounInfl

maison RegNounInfl ; ! a noun
femme RegNounInfl ; ! a noun
homme RegNounInfl ; ! a noun
fille RegNounInfl ; ! a noun 
fils RegNounInfl ; ! a noun 

LEXICON Verbs

regarder:regard RegularVerbsER ; ! regular verbs ending -er


LEXICON det
%<det%>:0 # ; 

le det ; ! masculine determiner 
la det ; ! female determiner
les det ; ! plural determiner 

LEXICON indefdet

un indefdet ; ! masculine determiner 
une indefdet ; ! feminine determiner 

! Resources:
! https://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Starting_a_new_language_with_HFST#Lexicon
! https://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Lttoolbox_and_lexc
! https://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Apertium-specific_conventions_for_lexc
! https://kitwiki.csc.fi/twiki/bin/view/KitWiki/HfstHome
! https://github.com/hfst/
! http://www.cis.upenn.edu/~cis639/docs/lexc.html
! https://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Hfst
